Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 1. Generally

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-7-801.
Declaration of policy.

Conservation of the state’s water resources is hereby declared to be a state function, and the public interest, welfare, convenience and necessity require the creation of public irrigation districts and the construction of a system of works, in the manner hereinafter provided, for the conservation, storage, distribution and utilization of water. The construction of said system of works by such districts, as herein provided for, is hereby declared to be in all respects for the welfare and benefit of the people of the state.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-1201; W.S. 1957, § 41-324.

§ 41-7-802.
Definitions.

“Public irrigation district”, “Public irrigation and power district”, or “district”, means a district organized under this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

], either as originally organized or as the same may be from time to time altered or extended.

The word “board” shall mean the board of directors of a district organized under this act.

The words “works” and “system” shall be deemed to include all property, rights, easements, and franchises relating thereto and deemed necessary or convenient for their operation, and all water rights acquired or exercised by the board in connection with such works, and shall embrace all means of conserving, controlling and distributing water, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, reservoirs, dams, diversion canals, distributing canals, lateral ditches and pumping units, mains, pipelines and water works systems, and shall include all such works for the conservation, development, storage, distribution and utilization of water, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, works for the purpose of irrigation, flood control, development, sale and distribution of power, watering of stock, supplying of water for public, domestic, industrial and other uses, whether such works be operated in conjunction with or separately from electric power plants or systems.

The word “project” shall mean any one (1) of the works hereinabove defined or any combination of such works which are physically connected or jointly managed and operated as a single unit.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-1202; W.S. 1957, § 41-325.

§ 41-7-803.
Creation; as corporate entity; district within district.

A district may be created as provided in this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] and may sue and be sued in its corporate name. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the organization of a district hereunder within, or partly within, the territorial boundaries of another district organized hereunder, so long as the works, systems or power plants, the operation of the same, the exercise of powers and the assumption of duties and responsibilities hereunder, of or in part of one such district, do not nullify, conflict with, or materially affect those of or on the part of another such district.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-1203; W.S. 1957, § 41-326.

§ 41-7-804.
Creation; procedures generally.

The procedure for creating and incorporating a district under the provisions of this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] shall be in accordance with the following method, to wit:

A public irrigation district may be organized under the provisions of this act by filing in the office of the state engineer a petition in compliance with the requirements hereinafter set forth, and the approval of said petition by the state engineer of Wyoming as hereinafter provided. Said petition shall be addressed to said state engineer and state in substance that it is the intent and purpose of the petitioners by said petition to create a district under the provisions of this act, subject to approval by said state engineer. Said petition must contain: (A) the name of the proposed district. If the proposed district is to engage in the business of owning or operating irrigation works, such name shall include the words “public irrigation district.” If the proposed district is also to engage in the business of acquiring, manufacturing or selling or distributing electric power, the name of the proposed district shall include the words “public irrigation and power district”; (B) the object and purpose of the system proposed to be constructed, together with a general description of the nature, location and method of operation of proposed irrigation works, and of proposed power systems if owning and operating power plants or systems is to be a part of the business of the proposed district; (C) a description of the lands constituting the proposed district and of the boundaries thereof; (D) the location of the principal place of business of the proposed district; (E) a statement that the proposed district shall not have the power to levy taxes; (F) the names and addresses of the members of the board of directors of the proposed district (not less than five (5) nor more than thirteen (13)) who shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified as provided for in this act. In the petition, the directors named shall be divided as nearly as possible into three (3) equal groups, the members of the first group to hold office until their successors, elected at the first district election thereafter, shall have qualified; the members of the second group to hold office until their successors, elected at the second district election thereafter, shall have qualified, and the members of the third group to hold office until their successors, elected at the third district election thereafter, shall have qualified. Thereafter all directors elected shall serve for a term of three (3) years and until their successors are elected and qualified. After the name of each director shall be stated to which of said three (3) groups he belongs. Said petition must be signed by twenty-five percent (25%) of the freeholders or entrymen of the area constituting said proposed district, or by their duly authorized representatives. On each petition, set opposite the signature of each petitioner, shall be stated his or her name and post-office address. To each sheet for petitioners’ signatures shall be attached a full and correct copy of the petition. Every sheet of every such petition containing signatures shall have upon it and below the signatures an affidavit by the circulator in substantially the following form:

State of Wyoming County of ss , being first duly sworn, deposes and says, that he is the circulator of the foregoing petition containing signatures; that each person whose name appears on said petition sheet personally signed said petition in the presence of affiant; that he believes that each of said signers is a freeholder of land to be included within the proposed district residing at the address written opposite his or her name, and that affiant stated to every petitioner before he or she affixed his or her signature the legal effect and nature of said petition. Circulator Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , (year). Notarial Officer;

Click to view

Upon receipt of such petition it shall be the duty of said state engineer to make an immediate investigation of the proposed district and of its proposed works, systems or plans, and, if deemed by said state engineer feasible and conforming to public convenience and welfare, the state engineer shall thereupon and within ninety (90) days from the receipt of such petition execute a certificate, in duplicate, setting forth a true copy of said petition and declaring that said petition has been approved. Said state engineer shall immediately cause said certificate to be forwarded to and filed in the office of the secretary of state and a copy thereof certified by him in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the principal place of business of the district is to be located. Thereupon, said district, under its designated name, shall be and constitute a body politic and corporate under the provisions of this act, and shall be a public corporation of the state of Wyoming. Immediately upon the filing of said certificate in the office of the secretary of state and a certified copy thereof in the office of said county clerk the members of the board of directors named in the petition shall qualify as provided for in this act and immediately assume the duties of their office. Failure or refusal to qualify within a period of fifteen (15) days thereafter shall be deemed to create a vacancy which shall be filled as in this act provided. The first meeting of the board of directors shall be called by the director first named in the petition who qualifies.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-1204; W.S. 1957, § 41-327; Laws 1999, ch. 150, § 2; 2011, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the form in (a)(i), substituted “Notarial Officer” for “Notary Public” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-805.
Board of directors; election; term; vacancies; bond; removal; conduct of election.

After the election of the original board of directors of a district as provided in W.S.

41-7-804

members of the board to succeed those in the three (3) groups provided for in said section 4 of this act, respectively, and to fill unexpired terms shall be nominated and elected and shall take office, subject to the provisions of this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] in the following manner, to wit: upon the first Tuesday in February next following the qualification of the original board of directors and upon the first Tuesday in February of each year thereafter, an election shall be held to elect directors to succeed those whose terms are about to expire. The term of each director thus elected shall commence upon the third Tuesday in February next ensuing after his election and shall continue for a period of three (3) years thereafter and until his successor is duly elected and qualified. Vacancies on the board by reason of death, disability, removal from the district or otherwise shall be filled by the board of directors and the members thus elected to fill vacancies shall serve until members to fill out the remainder of such terms respectively may be elected at the next succeeding district election. Each director before entering upon the duties of his office shall file with the secretary of state a bond in the penal sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) with good and sufficient surety to be approved by the secretary of state. Such bond shall be conditioned for the faithful performance of his duty as director. Members of the board may be removed from office for the same reasons and in the same manner as provided by law for the removal of county officers. All costs incident to the nomination and election of directors shall be paid by the district.

Election of directors shall be conducted in the following manner, to wit: the board of directors of the district shall fix the hour and place within the boundaries of the district, of each election and shall preside at the same. It shall be the duty of the board at least twenty (20) days prior to the date of election, to mail to each person or corporation entitled to vote thereat, at his or its last known place of residence or business, a notice stating the time, place and purpose of such elections. Every freeholder and entryman within the district and every person or corporation which is a party to a contract with the district for the purchase of water, electric power or other service or facility to be furnished by the district shall be entitled to cast one (1) vote at such election for each director to be elected thereat. At the hour and place of such election the board shall call the roll of those entitled to vote, and the number of votes to which each is entitled. They shall make a record of the qualified voters present, receive all proxies and prescribe the manner of canvassing votes. All proxies shall be in writing and signed by the person entitled to vote. Such number of candidates for directors required to fill existing vacancies or to succeed outgoing directors receiving the highest number of votes cast shall be declared elected.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-1205; W.S. 1957, § 41-328.

Cross references. —

As to board of directors of water conservancy districts, see §§

41-3-740

through

41-3-758

.

As to state board of control generally, see §§

41-4-201

through

41-4-211

.

As to board of district managers in connection with irrigation and drainage districts, see §§

41-6-120

through

41-6-127

.

As to irrigation district commissioners generally, see §§

41-7-301

through

41-7-318

.

For authority of board of directors to pass resolution calling for election to change from public irrigation and power district to irrigation district, see §

41-7-831

.

§ 41-7-806.
Board of directors; qualifications; officers; treasurer's bond; adoption of rules and regulations; audit department report; compensation.

The corporate powers of the district shall be vested in and exercised by the board of directors of the district. No person shall be qualified to hold office as a member of the board of directors of any district unless he or she shall be a freeholder or entryman of the district. The board of directors shall elect the officers of the district who shall be a president, a vice-president, a secretary and a treasurer, and the board shall appoint such executive committee and other officers, agents, servants and employees as shall be deemed necessary in transacting the business of the district. The president, vice-president and treasurer shall be elected from the membership of the board of directors. The treasurer shall furnish and maintain a corporate surety bond in an amount sufficient to cover all monies coming into his possession or control, which bond shall be satisfactory in form and with sureties approved by the board. The bond, as approved, shall be filed with the secretary of state. The board of directors may adopt rules and regulations or bylaws, not inconsistent with the provisions of this act, for the conduct of the business and affairs of the district. The board of directors shall cause to be kept accurate minutes of their meetings and accurate records and books of account, conforming to methods of bookkeeping approved by the director of the department of audit, clearly setting out and reflecting the entire operation, management, and business of the district. The books and records shall be kept at the principal place of business of the district and at reasonable business hours always open to public inspection. The fiscal year shall commence July 1. The board of directors, at the close of each year’s business, shall file a report of the books, records and financial affairs of the district with the department of audit as required by W.S.

9-1-507

. A copy of the report shall be placed and kept on file at the principal place of business of the district and shall be filed with the secretary of state. Members of the board of directors shall be paid their actual expenses while engaged in performing the duties of their office or otherwise engaged upon the business of the district, and in addition thereto they each shall receive as compensation for services a sum of not exceeding six dollars ($6.00) per day for a total working period not more than ten (10) days in each month.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 71-1206; W.S. 1957, § 41-329; Laws 1993, ch. 75, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “monies” for “moneys” in the fifth sentence, and “shall commence July 1” for “of the district shall coincide with the calendar year” in the ninth sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

§ 41-7-807.
Powers; generally.

A public irrigation district or a public irrigation and power district, organized under the provisions of this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] shall have the following powers and shall be entitled to own, have, or exercise the following rights, privileges and franchises:

Such district shall have all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes and may purchase, hold, sell and lease personal property and real estate reasonably necessary for the conduct of its business;

Such districts shall have the right and power to own, construct, reconstruct, improve, purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, extend, manage, use or operate any “irrigation works”, as defined in this act, and any and every kind of property, personal or real, necessary, useful or incident to such acquisition, extension, management, use and operation, whether the same be independent of or separated from the power, business or functions of the district or in connection or conjunction therewith, in whole or in part. In connection with the aforesaid powers, such district shall have the right and power to enter into any contract, lease, agreement or arrangement with any state, county, city, village, governmental or public corporation or association, or with any person, firm or corporation, public or private, or with the government of the United States, or with any officer, department, bureau or agency thereof, or with any corporation organized under federal law, for the purpose of exercising or utilizing any one (1) or more of the above enumerated powers, or for the sale, leasing, or otherwise furnishing or establishing water rights, electric power, water supply, conveyance and distribution of water, water service, or water storage, for irrigation or flood control or for the financing or payment of the cost and expenses incident to the construction, acquisition or operation of such irrigation works, or incident to any obligation or liability entered into or incurred by such district;

Such district shall have the right, power and authority to exercise any of the powers enumerated in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, either within or beyond or partly within and partly beyond the boundaries of the district and of the state of Wyoming if not otherwise prohibited by the law of such area, state or the United States of America;

Such district shall have the right to appropriate the waters of the state in the same manner as other appropriators in accordance with the general provisions of chapter 122, Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931, and other laws and regulations of the state of Wyoming, so far as the same may be applicable; provided, that such district shall, in the exercise of the powers conferred by this act, not interfere with, injure or otherwise damage or affect existing water rights.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 71-1207; W.S. 1957, § 41-330; Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “paragraph (ii) of this subsection” for “subsection 2” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 122, Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931, dealt with the subject of water. For current disposition of the provisions of ch. 122, see the Tables of Comparative Sections in Volume 11.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for overflow of water confined or diverted for public water power purposes, 91 ALR3d 1065.

§ 41-7-808.
Powers; eminent domain; application of provisions.

All provisions of law now applicable to irrigation districts, privately owned irrigation corporations, ditch companies, or power districts or power corporations, as regards the exercise of the power of eminent domain, the use and occupation of state and other public lands and highways, the appropriation, or other acquisition or use of water, waterpower, water rights, or water diversion or storage rights, for any of the purposes contemplated in this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

], the manner or method of construction and physical operation of irrigation works, storage dams, distribution systems, power plants, transmission lines and power systems, as herein contemplated, shall be applicable as nearly as may be, and insofar as not in conflict with the provisions of this act, to districts organized under this act in their exercise of the rights, powers and franchises and in the performance of the duties conferred or imposed upon them under the provisions of this act. In addition to any other rights and powers hereinabove conferred upon any district organized under the provisions of this act, such district shall have and exercise the power of eminent domain for the purposes and after the manner provided for in sections 38-401 to 38-416, inclusive, of chapter 38 [§§

1-26-401

, 1-26-403, 1-26-404] and in chapter 122, Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931, or in any one (1) or more of said sections or other applicable sections in said statutes made and provided. If any such district shall condemn private property or interests therein, the appraisement shall include such amount of damage as will accrue to the owner of the condemned property through severance thereof from other property of said owner, previously operated with that so condemned, as a unit.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 71-1208; W.S. 1957, § 41-331.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 122, Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931, dealt with the subject of water. For tables of comparative sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

“Sections 38-401 to 38-416,” referred to in the second sentence, appeared as §§

1-26-401

, 1-26-403 and 1-26-404 before being repealed in 1981. For present provisions as to eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

§ 41-7-809.
Powers; incurring indebtedness; security for loans; limitations; agreements.

A district organized hereunder may borrow money and incur indebtedness for a corporate use or purpose in this act authorized, provided, every indebtedness, liability or obligation of the district for the payment of money in whatever manner entered into or incurred, and whether arising from contract, implied contract, or otherwise, shall be payable solely, (i) from revenues, income, receipts and profits derived by the district from its operation and management of power plants, systems and irrigation works as in this act provided, or (ii) from the issuance or sale by the district of its warrants, notes, revenue bonds, debentures or other evidences of indebtedness (hereinafter referred to in this section as “district obligations”), payable solely from such revenues, income, receipts and profits. The maximum maturity of district obligations so issued shall be forty (40) years.

Any such district may pledge and put up as collateral security for a loan any district obligations. Any district issuing district obligations under the provisions of this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] is hereby specifically authorized and empowered to pledge all or any part of the revenues which the district may derive from the sale, conveyance and distribution of water for irrigation, storage of water, electrical energy, or other service, as security for the payment of the principal and interest thereon. Any such pledge of revenues shall be made by the directors of the district by resolution or by agreement with the purchasers or holders of such district obligations. Any such resolution or agreement may specify the particular revenues that are pledged and the terms and conditions to be performed by the district and the rights of the holders of such district obligations, and may provide for priorities of liens in any such revenues as between the holders of district obligations issued at different times or under different resolutions or agreements.

Such resolution or agreement may further provide for the refunding of any such district obligation through the issuance of other district obligations, entitled to rights and priorities similar in all respects to those held by the district obligations that are refunded and for the issuance of such refunding district obligations, either in exchange for district obligations then outstanding, or the sale thereof and the application of the proceeds of such sale to the retirement of the district obligations then outstanding.

Any such resolution or agreement may provide that all or any part of the revenues of the district shall be paid into a special fund and may set forth all the terms and conditions on which such special fund is to be collected, held and disposed of, whether partly or wholly for the benefit of the holders of such district obligations. Provisions may be made that such special fund shall be held by depositories designated or described in such resolution or agreement.

The directors of any district organized under the provisions of this act are authorized to agree with the holders of any such district obligations as to the maximum or minimum amounts which such district shall charge and collect for water, electrical energy, or other service sold by the district.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 71-1210; W.S. 1957, § 41-332; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 36; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 41-7-810.
Powers; obtaining federal grants or loans; acceptance of gifts.

Any district organized hereunder shall have and exercise any power conferred by this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] for the purpose of obtaining grants or loans or both from any federal agency pursuant to or by virtue of any and all acts of congress, independently or in conjunction with any other power or powers conferred by this act, or heretofore or hereafter conferred by any other law, and shall have power to accept from private owners or other sources, gifts, deeds or instruments of trust or title relating to land, water rights and any other form of property.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 71-1211; W.S. 1957, § 41-333.

§ 41-7-811.
Powers; purchase or conveyance of water rights.

Such district shall have power to purchase and acquire lands, water rights, rights of way, and real and personal properties of every nature in cooperation with the United States under such conditions as may to the board seem advisable, and to convey the same under such conditions, terms and restrictions as may be approved by the board of directors and the federal government or any of its agencies and to pay the purchase price and any and all construction costs or other necessary expenses and costs in connection with any works contemplated by this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] either from its own funds, or cooperatively with the federal government.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 71-1212; W.S. 1957, § 41-334.

§ 41-7-812.
Powers; taxation generally; liability of district for indebtedness.

The district shall have no power of taxation and no governmental authority shall have the power to levy or collect taxes for the purpose of paying, in whole or in part, any indebtedness or obligation of or incurred by the district as such or upon which the district may be or become in any manner liable, nor shall any privately owned property in such district, or the owner thereof, be directly or indirectly liable for any such district indebtedness or obligation beyond liability to perform any express contract, if any, between such owner and said district. No person, irrigation district, or irrigation company, shall be liable for the payment of any rent or charge for water storage, electric power, water supply or service unless a contract therefor has been entered into between such person, irrigation district, or irrigation company and the public irrigation district or public irrigation and power district furnishing such water storage, electric power or such water service.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 71-1209; W.S. 1957, § 41-335.

§ 41-7-813.
Construction of irrigation works; cost estimates; advertisement for bids; contracts.

Before any district shall enter into any contract for the construction, building, alteration, extension, or improvement of any irrigation works, power plant or system, or any part or section thereof for the use of the district, or for the purchase of any materials, machinery, or apparatus, such district shall cause estimates of the cost thereof to be made by some competent engineer or engineers and if such estimated cost shall exceed the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) no such contract shall be entered into for a price, cost or consideration exceeding such estimate nor without advertising for sealed bids. Prior to such advertisement, plans and specifications for the proposed construction work or materials shall be prepared and filed at the principal office or place of business of the district. Such advertisement shall be inserted for three (3) consecutive issues, with not less than twenty (20) days intervening between the first and last publication dates, in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation in the district and, in the discretion of the board of directors of the district, in such additional newspapers or trade or technical periodicals as may be selected by the board in order to give proper notice of the receiving of bids. Such advertisement shall designate the nature of the construction work proposed to be done or materials proposed to be purchased; that the plans and specifications therefor may be inspected at the office of the district, giving the location thereof, and shall designate the time within which bids shall be filed and the date, hour and place the same shall be opened. The board of directors of the district, with the assistance of the state engineer, whose duty it shall be to supervise such lettings, may let the contract for such work or materials to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the sole discretion of the board, all bids tendered may be rejected and readvertisement for bids made in the manner, form and time in this section provided. No such contract shall be valid nor shall any money of the district be expended thereunder unless advertisement and letting shall have been had as in this section provided. Such contract shall provide that wherever possible workmen who are citizens of Wyoming shall be employed by the contractor. All provisions of W.S.

16-6-112

through

16-6-115

, with reference to contractor’s bonds, shall be applicable and effective as to any contract let pursuant to the provisions of this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

]; provided further, that if all or a portion of the cost of the proposed works is to be met by grant of labor or a grant in aid from a federal or state agency, the rules and regulations of which agency provide that work shall not be done by contract, the board may proceed with the necessary construction or other work without first complying with any of the foregoing provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 71-1213; W.S. 1957, § 41-336.

Cross references. —

As to public works and contractor's bond, see §§

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

.

§ 41-7-814.
Expenditures.

Money of the district shall be paid out or expended only upon approval of the board of directors and by warrant or other instrument in writing signed by the president and by the treasurer of the district. In case of the death, absence or other disqualification of the president, the vice-president shall sign warrants or other instruments.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 71-1214; W.S. 1957, § 41-337.

§ 41-7-815.
Sale or mortgage of irrigation works.

Any project created under the provisions of this act [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] shall not be sold to private interests. No irrigation works, power plant, or system owned by the district shall be sold, alienated or mortgaged by the district, except under the following circumstances, to wit: if, in order to borrow money from the federal government or from any of its agencies or from the state of Wyoming, it shall become necessary that the district mortgage or otherwise hypothecate any or all its said property or assets to secure the payment of a loan or loans made to it by or from such source or sources, the district is hereby authorized and empowered to mortgage or hypothecate such property and assets for such purpose. Nothing in this section contained shall prevent the district from assigning, pledging, or otherwise hypothecating its revenues, incomes, receipts or profits to secure the payment of indebtedness to the federal government or any agency thereof, or the state of Wyoming, provided, that the state of Wyoming shall never pledge its credit or funds, or any part thereof, for the payment or settlement of any indebtedness or obligation whatsoever of any district created under the provisions of this act; and provided further, that if any district created under this act shall execute and deliver a mortgage or trust deed to secure the payment of any moneys borrowed by it for the purposes herein authorized, it may be provided in such mortgage or trust deed that the same may be foreclosed upon default and that a receiver may be appointed by any court of competent jurisdiction with such authority as may be provided for in such mortgage or trust deed.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 123, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 71-1215; W.S. 1957, § 41-338.